Utah statutes.
62A-7-601.   Youth services for prevention and early intervention -- Program standards -- Program services.

(1)  The division shall establish and operate prevention and early intervention youth services programs.

(2)  The division shall adopt with the approval of the board statewide policies and procedures, including minimum standards for the organization and operation of youth services programs.

(3)  The division shall establish housing, programs, and procedures to ensure that youth who are receiving services under this section and who are not in the custody of the division are served separately from youth who are in custody of the division.

(4)  The division may enter into contracts with state and local governmental entities and private providers to provide the youth services.

(5)  The division shall establish and administer juvenile receiving centers and other programs to provide temporary custody, care, risk-needs assessments, evaluations, and control for nonadjudicated youth placed with the division.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 13, 2005 General Session

